Massachusetts, session 194th, S1440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3A of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law, regulation, or policy to the contrary, the
executive office of housing and livable communities, in collaboration with the attorney general,
shall not condition, restrict, or withhold eligibility for any state funding, grant, or financial
assistance including, but not limited to: (1) the MassWorks Infrastructure Program; (2)
Community Planning Grants; (3) the Massachusetts Downtown Initiative; (4) Urban Agenda
Grants; (5) the Rural and Small Town Development Fund; (6) the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund; (7) the Site Readiness Program; (8) the Underutilized Properties Program; (9) the
Collaborative Workspace Program; (10) Real Estate Services Technical Assistance; (11) the
Commonwealth Places Program; (12) Land Use Planning Grants; (13) Local Acquisitions for
of 2

Natural Diversity (LAND) Grants; (14) Municipal Vulnerability Preparedness (MVP) Planning
and Project Grants; and(15) any successor programs or comparable funding initiatives. The
executive office shall not condition funding on the basis of a municipality’s compliance or
noncompliance with this section.
of 2